Arkansas, session 2025, HB1702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-402(c)(2)(B), concerning the
machinery and equipment that is included in the list of machinery and
equipment that is used directly in the manufacturing process for purposes of
the sales tax exemption on certain machinery and equipment, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(vii)(a) Machinery and equipment used to
mechanically recycle post-use materials in a closed-loop circular process,
including without limitation machinery and equipment:
(1) Used to identify, gather, transport,
and store post-use materials;
(2) Used to convert post-use materials
*JLL207*
03/05/2025 12:40:46 PM JLL207

HB1702
into raw materials, work-in-process materials, or a finished product; and
(3) That convey converted post-use
materials directly to where it is reintroduced into the taxpayer’s
manufacturing process.
(b) As used in this subdivision
(c)(2)(B)(vii):
(1) “Closed-loop circular process” means
a manufacturing process in which reclaimed post-use materials are converted
and reintroduced into the original process and become a recognized component
of the finished product;
(2)(A) “Mechanically recycle” means to
reclaim and convert post-use materials into materials that are recognized in
the finished product using a series of physical processes.
(B) “Mechanically recycle”
includes without limitation washing, drying, grinding, regranulating, and
compounding; and
(3) “Post-use material” means a material
that is:
(A) Generated and reclaimed
directly from the taxpayer’s manufacturing process;
(B) Managed as an item of value in
a controlled manner;
(C) Intended to be mechanically
recycled into an item of raw materials, work-in-process material, or a
finished product;
(D) Not originated as a post-
consumer waste material; and
(E) Not mixed with any other solid
waste or hazardous waste onsite or during processing; and

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-53-114(c)(3)(B), concerning the
machinery and equipment that is included in the list of machinery and
equipment that is used directly in the manufacturing process for purposes of
the use tax exemption on certain machinery and equipment, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(vi)(a) Machinery and equipment used to mechanically
03/05/2025 12:40:46 PM JLL207

HB1702
recycle post-use materials generated directly from the manufacturing
operation in a closed-loop circular process, including without limitation
machinery and equipment:
(1) Used to identify, gather, transport,
and store post-use materials;
(2) Used to convert post-use materials
into raw materials, work-in-process materials, or a finished product; and
(3) That convey converted post-use
materials directly to where it is reintroduced into the taxpayer’s
manufacturing process.
(b) As used in this subdivision (c)(3)(B)(vi):
(1) “Closed-loop circular process” means
a manufacturing process in which reclaimed post-use materials are converted
and reintroduced into the original process and become a recognized component
of the finished product;
(2)(A) “Mechanically recycle” means to
reclaim and convert post-use materials into materials that are recognized in
the finished product using a series of physical processes.
(B) “Mechanically recycle”
includes without limitation washing, drying, grinding, regranulating, and
compounding; and
(3) “Post-use material” means a material
that is:
(A) Generated and reclaimed
directly from the taxpayer’s manufacturing process;
(B) Managed as an item of value in
a controlled manner;
(C) Intended to be mechanically
recycled into an item of raw materials, work-in-process material, or a
finished product;
(D) Not originated as a post-
consumer waste material; and
(E) Not mixed with any other solid
waste or hazardous waste onsite or during processing; and

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
03/05/2025 12:40:46 PM JLL207

HB1702
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.


































03/05/2025 12:40:46 PM JLL207